Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.805

Pledged bond retirement funds to be set aside from tuition and fees—1981 c 257.

Notwithstanding any other provision of chapter 257, Laws of 1981, the boards of regents and trustees of the respective institutions of higher education shall set aside from tuition and fees charged in each schedule an amount heretofore pledged and necessary for the purposes of bond retirement until such time as any such debt has been satisfied.

[ 1981 c 257 s 10.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 257: See note following RCW 28B.15.031.